Utah statutes.
58-40a-305.   Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, this chapter
does not require the licensure of a medical assistant as defined in Section
58-67-102 or 58-68-102 or an individual who assists in an emergency or in
providing services for which no fee is contemplated, charged, or received,
provided the individual does not hold himself out as an athletic trainer.
